public/buthuru/espeak-gup/gup_rules
.replace

.group a
	a	a

.group ä
	ä	a:

.group b
	b	b

.group d
	dh	d
	dj	J
	d	d

.group ḏ
	ḏ	d.

.group e
	e	e

.group g
	g	g

.group i
	i	i

.group k
	k	k

.group l
	l	l

.group ḻ
	ḻ	l.

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	nh	n
	ny	n^
	n	n

.group ṉ
	ṉ	n.

.group ŋ
	ŋ	N

.group o
	o	o

.group p
	p	p

.group r
	rr	r
	r	z.

.group t
	th	t
	tj	c
	t	t

.group ṯ
	ṯ	t.

.group u
	u	u

.group w
	w	w

.group y
	y	j

.group '
	'	?
